Maryland, session 2025, HB1135.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
9–320.
(a) There is a Maryland Clean Water Fund.
(b) The following payments shall be made into the Maryland Clean Water Fund:
(1) All application fees, permit fees, renewal fees, and funds collected by
the Department under this subtitle, including any civil or administrative penalty or any
fine imposed by a court under the provisions of this subtitle;
(2) Any civil penalty or any fine imposed by a court under the provisions of
Title 5, Subtitle 5 of this article relating to water appropriation and use;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1135*

HOUSE BILL 1135
(3) Any civil or administrative penalty or any fine imposed by a court under
the provisions of Title 4, Subtitle 1 of this article;
(4) Any fees or funds that the Department collects under Subtitle 2, Part
III of this title and §§ 9–269 and 9–270 of this title and any civil or administrative penalty
or fine imposed by a court under the provisions of Subtitle 2 of this title; and
(5) Any fees or funds that the Department collects under Subtitle 24 of this
title and any civil or administrative penalty or fine imposed by a court under the provisions
of Subtitle 24 of this title.
(c) The Department shall use the Maryland Clean Water Fund for activities that
are related to:
(1) The identification, monitoring, and regulation of the proper discharge
of effluent into the waters of the State including program development of these activities
as provided by the State budget;
(2) The management, conservation, protection, and preservation of the
State’s groundwater and surface water including program development of these activities
as provided by the State budget;
(3) Correcting to the extent possible the failure to implement or maintain
erosion and sediment controls;
(4) Administration of the sediment control program;
(5) Emergency removal of sewage sludge or mitigation of the effect of any
utilization of sewage sludge that the Department finds:
(i) Endangers public health, safety, or welfare; or
(ii) Endangers or damages natural resources;
(6) Activities that are:
(i) Conducted by the Department, by a local health official, or by the
local health official’s designee under § 9–243(e) of this title;
(ii) Related to identifying, monitoring, or regulating the utilization
of sewage sludge, including program development; and
(iii) Conducted by the Department under Subtitle 24 of this title;
[and]
(7) Providing supplemental inspections and monitoring of sewage sludge
utilization sites by:

HOUSE BILL 1135 3
(i) Contracting with a county on request of that county to provide
supplemental inspections and monitoring; and
(ii) Limiting the value of services provided under the contract to no
more than 45% of the generator fees for sludge utilized in that county that is generated
outside of that county or service area; AND
(8) URBAN FOREST MANAGEMENT.
(d) An expenditure that the Department makes under subsection (c)(5) of this
section shall be reimbursed to the Department by the sewage sludge utilizer whose sewage
sludge utilization brought about the expenditure by:
(1) Endangering public health, safety, or welfare; or
(2) Endangering or damaging natural resources.
(e) In addition to any other legal action authorized by this subtitle, the Attorney
General may bring an action against any person who fails to reimburse the Department
under subsection (d) of this section to recover any expenditure that the Department makes
under subsection (c)(5) of this section.
(f) In determining the use of the Maryland Clean Water Fund, priority shall be
given to activities relating to the water quality of the Chesapeake Bay and its tributaries.
(g) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, funds credited and any interest
accrued to the Fund:
(1) Shall remain available until expended; and
(2) May not be reverted to the General Fund under any other provision of
law.
(h) On or before January 15 of each year, the Department shall report to the
Senate [Education, Health, and Environmental Affairs] Committee ON EDUCATION,
ENERGY, AND THE ENVIRONMENT and the House Environment and Transportation
Committee, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, on the status of
the Maryland Clean Water Fund, including a detailed description of all revenues and
expenditures of the Fund for the previous year.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.